Washington statutes.
RCW 18.74.015

Referral to health care practitioners—When required.

(1) Physical therapists shall refer persons under their care to authorized health care practitioners if they have reasonable cause to believe symptoms or conditions are present which require services beyond the scope of their practice or for which physical therapy is contraindicated.

(2) A violation of this section is unprofessional conduct under this chapter and chapter 18.130 RCW.

[ 1988 c 185 s 3.]